Hawaii statutes.
§1-28.5 Publication of notice. (a)
Notwithstanding any other statute, law, charter provision, ordinance, or rule
to the contrary, whenever a government agency is required to give public notice
or to publish notice, the notice shall be given only as follows:

(1) For statewide publication:

(A) In a daily or weekly publication of
statewide circulation; or

(B) By publication in separate daily or
weekly publications whose combined circulation is statewide; and

(2) For county-wide publication, by publication in a
daily or weekly publication in the affected county.

Additional supplemental notice may also be given
through Hawaii FYI, the State's interactive computer system.

(b) For purposes of this section, the
comptroller pursuant to chapter 103D shall determine a publication for all
government agencies to enable the public to go to one source of publication for
published public notice on each island.

(c) Whenever a public notice is published in a
newspaper or other publication described in subsection (a), proof of the
publication shall be the affidavit of the printer, publisher, principal clerk,
or business manager of the newspaper or other publication or of the designated
agent of the group that published the notice.

(d) This section shall not apply to notices
required by chapters 103D, 103F, 127A, and 523A.

(e) For purposes of this section,
"government agency" means each department, board, commission, or
officer of the State or any of its political subdivisions. [L 1998, c 2, §2; am
L 1999, c 160, §22; am L 2003, c 74, §1; am L 2014, c 111, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next